District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Streatery Program Endorsement Extension and Medical Cannabis
Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 25-113(a)(6) of the District of Columbia Code is amended as follows:
(a) Strike the phrase “2022 and 2023” wherever it appears and insert the phrase “2022,
2023, 2024, and through December 31, 2025” in its place.
(b) Subparagraph (A)(i)(II) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the phrase
“annually with the fee for 2025 due by April 1, 2025; except, that an on-premises retailer
licensee, class C/T, D/T, C/N, or D/N, or a manufacturer licensee class B, shall pay the fee for
2025 by September 30, 2025;” in its place.
Sec. 3. Section 7(q)(1) of the Legalization of Marijuana for Medical Treatment Initiative
of 1999, effective July 27, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-210; D.C. Official Code § 7-1671.06(q)(1)), is
amended to read as follows:
“(q)(1)(A) A retailer or internet retailer shall not locate within any residential district or
within 400 feet of a preschool, primary or secondary school, or recreation center; except, that a
license holder or an applicant who has applied prior to the effective date of the Medical Cannabis
Clarification and Program Enforcement Amendment Act of 2024, effective December 17, 2024
(D.C. Law 25-255; 71 DCR 13505), shall not be permitted to locate within 300 feet of a
preschool, primary or secondary school, or recreation center.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, an unlicensed
establishment license holder or applicant that applied for a retailer or internet retailer license
during the 90-calendar day open application period set forth in section 7a(a)(1) shall be permitted
to locate within 300 feet of a preschool, primary or secondary school, or recreation center where
the main entrance to the preschool, primary school or secondary school, or recreation center is
actually on or occupies ground zoned commercial or industrial according to the official atlases of
the Zoning Commission of the District of Columbia.”.
Sec. 4. Repealers.
The Streatery Program Endorsement Extension Temporary Amendment Act of 2024,
effective March 7, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-294; 72 DCR 3105), is repealed.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2